North Carolina, session 2025, HB267.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 42 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 42-36.4. Expungement of court records of certain summary ejectment actions.
(a) The clerk of superior court shall, without further petition or hearing, enter an order
requiring all court records made in summary ejectment proceedings to be expunged from the files
of the court 30 days after the resolution of the proceedings if the proceedings are resolved in one
of the following ways:
(1) The proceedings are voluntarily dismissed prior to a magistrate's entry of an
order for possession.
(2) The proceedings are voluntarily dismissed prior to the district court's entry of
an order of possession, provided that the proceedings have been withdrawn
from small claims court and brought before the district court, or the
proceedings have been moved to district court pursuant to an appeal for a trial
de novo.
(b) The clerk of court shall not automatically expunge court records related to summary
ejectment proceedings where judgment is entered in favor of the defendant on the merits of the
initial action; however, the defendant may file a petition, and the clerk of superior court shall,
without a hearing, enter an order requiring all court records made in the summary ejectment
proceedings to be expunged from the files of the court in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (c) of this section.
(c) For summary ejectment proceedings commenced prior to October 1, 2025, the
defendant may file a petition in the court in which the underlying summary ejectment action was
filed requesting all court records made in the summary ejectment proceedings be expunged from
the files of the court if the action was resolved in one of the following ways:
(1) The proceedings are voluntarily dismissed prior to a magistrate's entry of an
order for possession.
(2) The proceedings are voluntarily dismissed prior to the district court's entry of
an order of possession, provided that the proceedings have been withdrawn
from small claims court and brought before the district court, or the
proceedings have been moved to district court pursuant to an appeal for a trial
de novo.
*H267-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Judgment is entered in favor of the defendant on the merits of the initial action,
all applicable appeals periods have passed, and all applicable appeals have
been resolved.
Upon finding that a summary ejectment action was resolved in one of the ways described by
this subsection, the court shall, without a hearing, enter an order requiring the expungement of
the court records related to the summary ejectment action.
(d) For summary ejectment actions in which judgment is entered in favor of the plaintiff
on the initial merits of the action, the defendant, after (i) all applicable appeals periods have
passed, (ii) all applicable appeals have been resolved, and (iii) the passing of a three-year waiting
period beginning on the date of entry of the judgment on the initial merits of the action, may file
a petition in the court in which the underlying summary ejectment action was filed requesting all
court records made in the summary ejectment proceedings be expunged from the files of the
court. Upon finding that the petitioner has stabilized his or her housing, the court shall, without
a hearing, enter an order requiring all court records made in the summary ejectment proceedings
to be expunged from the files of the court. The court may consider at least all of the following
when determining if the petitioner has stabilized his or her housing:
(1) Proof of petitioner's consistent and timely payment of rent or mortgage
payments during the three-year waiting period.
(2) An affidavit, signed by the petitioner, stating that the petitioner has not been
named as a defendant in any additional summary ejectment or foreclosure
proceedings during the three-year waiting period.
(e) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop forms for the petitions required
by this section. The forms shall require the petitioner to provide at least all of the following: (i)
the date that the order of dismissal, stay of proceedings, or entry of judgment was entered for the
summary ejectment action, (ii) the address of the property that was subject to the summary
ejectment action, and (iii) the name of the plaintiff in the summary ejectment action."
SECTION 2. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and make
available the petition forms required by G.S. 42-36.4, as enacted in Section 1 of this act, no later
than September 30, 2025.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2025. The remainder
of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 267-First Edition